Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1150.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3(d), 4(a) and 14.1 of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, are amended to read:Section 3. Definitions.--As used in this act:* * *(d) "Wages" mean compensation due to any employe by reason of his or her employment, payable in legal tender of the United 123456789101112131415161718 States or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to such deductions, charges or allowances as may be permitted by regulations of the secretary under section 9."Wage" paid to any employe includes the reasonable cost, as determined by the secretary, to the employer for furnishing such employe with board, lodging, or other facilities, if such board, lodging, or other facilities are customarily furnished by such employer to his or her employes: Provided, That the cost of board, lodging, or other facilities shall not be included as a part of the wage paid to any employe to the extent it is excluded therefrom under the terms of a bona fide collective-bargaining agreement applicable to the particular employe: Provided, further, That the secretary is authorized to determine the fair value of such board, lodging, or other facilities for defined classes of employes and in defined areas, based on average cost to the employer or to groups of employers similarly situated, or average value to groups of employes, or other appropriate measures of fair value. Such evaluations, where applicable and pertinent, shall be used in lieu of actual measure of cost in determining the wage paid to any employe.In determining the hourly wage an employer is required to pay a tipped employe, the amount paid such employe by his or her employer shall be an amount equal to: (i) the cash wage paid the employe which for the purposes of the determination shall be not less than the cash wage [required to be paid the employe on the date immediately prior to the effective date of this subparagraph;] of five dollars ($5.00) an hour after June 30, 2025, six dollars and twenty-five cents ($6.25) an hour after December 31, 2025, seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) an hour 20250HB1150PN1241 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 after June 30, 2026, eight dollars and seventy-five cents ($8.75) an hour after December 31, 2026, ten dollars ($10.00) an hour after June 30, 2027, eleven dollars and twenty-five cents ($11.25) an hour after December 31, 2027, twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) an hour after June 30, 2028, and thirteen dollars and seventy-five cents ($13.75) an hour after December 31, 2029, through June 30, 2029; and (ii) an additional amount on account of the tips received by the employe which is equal to the difference between the wage specified in subparagraph (i) and the wage in effect under section 4 of this act. The additional amount on account of tips may not exceed the value of tips actually received by the employe. The previous sentence shall not apply with respect to any tipped employe unless:(1) Such employe has been informed by the employer of the provisions of this subsection;(2) All tips received by such employe have been retained by the employe and shall not be surrendered to the employer to be used as wages to satisfy the requirement to pay the current hourly minimum rate in effect; where the gratuity is added to the charge made by the establishment, either by the management, or by the customer, the gratuity shall become the property of the employe; except that this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit the pooling of tips among employes who customarily and regularly receive tips. Effective July 1, 2029, an employer is required to pay a tipped employe the full minimum wage in effect under section 4 of this act. In addition, all gratuities received by such employe or added to the charge made by the establishment, either by the management or by the customer, shall become the property of the employe and shall not be used by the employer as wages to satisfy the requirement to pay the 20250HB1150PN1241 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 current hourly minimum rate in effect. Nothing in this definition shall be construed to prohibit the pooling of tips among employes who customarily and regularly receive tips, however an employer may not keep any gratuities received by an employe for any purpose, including allowing managers or supervisors to keep any portion of an employe's gratuities.* * *Section 4. Minimum Wages.--Except as may otherwise be provided under this act:(a) Every employer shall pay to each of his or her employes wages for all hours worked at a rate of not less than:(1) Two dollars sixty-five cents ($2.65) an hour upon the effective date of this amendment.(2) Two dollars ninety cents ($2.90) an hour during the year beginning January 1, 1979.(3) Three dollars ten cents ($3.10) an hour during the year beginning January 1, 1980.(4) Three dollars thirty-five cents ($3.35) an hour after December 31, 1980.(5) Three dollars seventy cents ($3.70) an hour beginning February 1, 1989.(6) Five dollars fifteen cents ($5.15) an hour beginning September 1, 1997.(7) Six dollars twenty-five cents ($6.25) an hour beginning January 1, 2007.(8) Seven dollars fifteen cents ($7.15) an hour beginning July 1, 2007.(9) Fifteen dollars ($15) an hour beginning January 1, 2026.(10) Beginning January 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter, the minimum wage shall be increased by an annual 20250HB1150PN1241 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cost-of-living adjustment calculated by the secretary using the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area. In calculating the adjustment, the secretary shall use the most recent twelve-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. At least sixty days prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, the percentage increase and the minimum wage amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of five cents (5¢), shall be determined by the secretary. The secretary shall, within ten days following the determination, transmit a notice of the determination to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 14.1. Preemption.--(a) [Except as set forth in subsection (b), this act shall preempt and supersede any local ordinance or rule concerning the subject matter of this act.(b) This section does not prohibit local regulation pursuant to an ordinance which was adopted by a municipality prior to January 1, 2006, and which remained in effect on January 1, 2006.] Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a municipality shall be permitted to pass local ordinances or rules regulating the minimum wage for that municipality. Nothing in this act shall permit a municipality to pass a wage lower than the minimum wage as required by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, or that are required under section 4 of this act and 29 U.S.C. Ch. 8 (relating to fair labor standards).(b) A municipality that adopts a minimum wage ordinance or other measure may adopt provisions for the local enforcement of 20250HB1150PN1241 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the ordinance or measure, including enforcement by private parties. Nothing in this section shall preclude the secretary from enforcing the provisions of this act.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Municipality" means a county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality or optional charter municipality.Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment of section 3(d) of the act shall take effect January 1, 2026.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1150PN1241 - 6 - 123456789101112131415